FST/hsi/phonetize_hsi.xfst
define vowel ā|a|e|i|o|u;
define consonant b|c|č|čʰ|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|pʰ|q|r|ṛ|s|š|t|tʰ|v|w|x|y|z;

! define replace vowel -> ā || _ "^";
! define clean "^" -> 0;
define buffer PL1 -> y e n || vowel "^" _,,PL1 -> e n || consonant consonant "^" _,, PL1 -> consonant e n || consonant "^" _;
! gemination problem: how to refer to the same consonant instead of using any consonant

! define buffer PL2 -> replace || vowel "^" _,, PL2 -> ā s|| consonant "^" _;
define buffer PL3 -> y u || vowel "^" _,, PL3 -> u || consonant "^" _,, PL3 -> y u s || m i r i "^" _;
! exception: miri -> miriyus

regex %+N -> "^",,
		%+non%{NOM%} -> 0,,
		%+PL -> PL1 || %+non%{NOM%} (%+FEM) _,,
		%+PL -> PL2 || %+NOM %+MASC _,,
		%+PL -> PL3 || %+NOM %+FEM _,,
		%+NOM -> 0,,
		%+SG -> 0,,
		%+MASC -> 0,,
		%+FEM -> 0,,
		%+PSS1S -> y,,
		%+PSS2S -> 0,,
		%+PSS3S -> s,,
		%+PSS1P -> m,,
		%+PSS2P -> m,,
		%+PSS3P -> ā n,,  ! not accurate, just for testing
		clean;
